Hawaii, session 2026, GM1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that average salaries for
teachers in Hawaii generally fall in the middle of national
rankings of teachers’ pay. However, once the salaries of
teachers in the State are adjusted for the cost of living, they
are the lowest-paid in the nation. The national average salary
for all teachers stands at approximately $30,086, when cost of
living is considered. However, the average starting salary for
teachers in Hawaii is $24,409, when adjusted for cost of living.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that close to half of
teachers in Hawaii are leaving the profession or the State
altogether within five years of starting, posing a significant
problem for students. Slightly more than nine hundred teachers
were hired in 2013, but as of 2018, fewer than four hundred
seventy of them remained in the classroom. Within the last five
years, the number of teachers leaving Hawaii has increased to
seventy-one per cent. Only fifty-one per cent of teachers hired
during the 2013-2014 school year were still teaching in Hawaii
2026-3288 HB1890 CDl HMSO 1

Page 2 H.B. NO.
hTs
I . . I ’I . g 2
C.D. 1
five years later, a decrease from fifty-four per cent during the
previous year. As the State continues to address matters of
teacher recruitment and retention, it is crucial to support
current teachers now.
The purpose of this Act is to provide automatic step
increases in teacher salaries for each year of satisfactory
service completed, subject to funds appropriated by the
legislature.
SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§302A- Salary increases; annual, longevity.
Teachers who have completed one year of satisfactory service and
complied with the requirements of sections 302A-601.5 through
302A-642 and section 302A-701, as applicable, shall be entitled
to an annual increment if negotiated into a collective
bargaining agreement under section 89-9, subject to subsection
(c) ♦
(b) Teachers who have served satisfactorily for three
years in their maximum increment step or in any longevity step
pursuant to section 302A-624 and have complied with the other
2026-3288 HB1890 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
requirements of sections 302A-601.5 through 302A-642 and section
302A-701^ as applicable^ shall be entitled to longevity step
increases if negotiated into a collective bargaining agreement
under section 89-9^ subject to subsection (c).
(c) Any collective bargaining agreement negotiated
pursuant to section 89-9 that provides for annual increments or
longevity step increases under this section and requires the
expenditure of public funds shall be subject to funding by a
specific appropriation enacted by the legislature. The
collective bargaining agreement shall not be effective or
enforceable unless the legislature appropriates sufficient funds
for its implementation. The legislature may reject the
collective bargaining agreement in whole by declining to
appropriate the funds necessary to implement it."
SECTION 3. Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§302D- Salary increases; annual, longevity. (a)
Teachers who have completed one year of satisfactory service and
complied with the requirements of this chapter that pertain to
the employment conditions and compensation for teachers, as
2026-3288 HB1890 CDl HMSO

Page 4 1890
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
deemed applicable by their employing public charter school,
shall be entitled to an annual increment if negotiated into a
collective bargaining agreement under section 89-9, subject to
subsection (c).
(b) Teachers who have served satisfactorily for three
years in their maximum increment step or in any longevity step,
if any, and have complied with the reguirements of this chapter
that pertain to the employment conditions and compensation for
teachers, as deemed applicable by their employing public charter
school, shall be entitled to longevity step increases if
negotiated into a collective bargaining agreement under section
89-9, subject to subsection (c).
(c) Any collective bargaining agreement negotiated
pursuant to section 89-9 that provides for annual increments or
longevity step increases under this section and requires the
expenditure of public funds shall be subject to funding by a
specific appropriation enacted by the legislature. The
collective bargaining agreement shall not be effective or
enforceable unless the legislature appropriates sufficient funds
for its implementation. The legislature may reject the
2026-3288 HB1890 CDl HMSO

Page 5 1890
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
collective bargaining agreement in whole by declining to
appropriate the funds necessary to implement it."
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3288 HB1890 CDl HMSO

iiniiiiiiiiiiiiNiiilinn

H.B. NO. 2?,
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 13th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1890, HD 3, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1890, H.D. 3, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
180-26